Utah statutes.
20A-11-1501.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Labor organization" means a lawful organization of any kind that is composed, in whole or in part, of employees and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or other terms and conditions of employment.

(2)  "Labor organization" includes an employee association and union for employees of public and private sector employers.



Enacted by Chapter 389, 2010 General Session

